Indiana, session 2026, HB1117.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-9-18.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 18.5. Uniform Municipal Innkeeper's Tax
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a municipality that is not
required or authorized to impose an innkeeper's tax under any
other chapter of this article. A municipality that imposes an
innkeeper's tax under this chapter may not also impose an
innkeeper's tax under another chapter.
Sec. 2. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Fiscal body" has the meaning set forth in IC 36-1-2-6.
(2) "Gross retail income" has the meaning set forth in
IC 6-2.5-1-5.
(3) "Municipality" has the meaning set forth in IC 36-1-2-11.
(4) "Person" has the meaning set forth in IC 6-2.5-1-3.
Sec. 3. (a) Subject to section 7 of this chapter, the fiscal body of
a municipality may levy a tax on every person engaged in the
2026 IN 1117—LS 6619/DI 125


business of renting or furnishing, for periods of less than thirty (30)
days, any room or rooms, lodgings, or accommodations in any:
(1) hotel;
(2) motel;
(3) boat motel;
(4) inn;
(5) college or university memorial union;
(6) college or university residence hall or dormitory; or
(7) tourist cabin;
located in the municipality.
(b) The tax does not apply to a transaction in which:
(1) a student rents lodgings in a college or university residence
hall while that student participates in a course of study for
which the student receives college credit from a college or
university located in the municipality; or
(2) a person rents a room, lodging, or accommodations for a
period of thirty (30) days or more.
(c) The tax must be imposed at a flat rate amount per night and
may not exceed the rate of five dollars ($5) per night. The tax is in
addition to:
(1) the state gross retail tax imposed under IC 6-2.5; and
(2) a county innkeeper's tax imposed in the county in which
the municipality is located, if any.
(d) The fiscal body of the municipality may adopt an ordinance
to require that the tax be reported on forms approved by the fiscal
officer of the municipality and that the tax shall be paid monthly
to the fiscal officer. If such an ordinance is adopted, the tax shall be
paid to the fiscal officer not more than twenty (20) days after the
end of the month the tax is collected. If such an ordinance is not
adopted, the tax shall be imposed, paid, and collected in exactly the
same manner as the state gross retail tax is imposed, paid, and
collected under IC 6-2.5.
(e) All of the provisions of IC 6-2.5 relating to rights, duties,
liabilities, procedures, penalties, definitions, exemptions, and
administration are applicable to the imposition and administration
of the tax imposed under this section except to the extent those
provisions are in conflict or inconsistent with the specific
provisions of this chapter or the requirements of the fiscal officer
of the municipality. If the tax is paid to the department of state
revenue, the return to be filed for the payment of the tax under this
section may be either a separate return or may be combined with
the return filed for the payment of the state gross retail tax as the
2026 IN 1117—LS 6619/DI 125


department of state revenue may, by rule, determine.
(f) If the tax is paid to the department of state revenue, the
amounts received from the tax imposed under this section shall be
paid monthly by the treasurer of state to the fiscal officer of the
municipality upon warrants issued by the state comptroller.
Sec. 4. (a) If a tax is imposed under section 3 of this chapter, the
municipal fiscal officer shall establish a convention, visitor, and
tourism promotion fund. The municipal fiscal officer shall deposit
into the fund all amounts received from a tax imposed under
section 3 of this chapter.
(b) Money in a convention, visitor, and tourism promotion fund
may be expended, after appropriation by the municipal fiscal body,
only for the following purposes:
(1) To promote and encourage conventions, visitors, and
tourism within the municipality, including expenditures for
advertising, promotional activities, trade shows, special
events, and recreation.
(2) To create new parks and amenities, and to expand and
enhance existing parks and amenities.
(3) To pay the costs of municipal services related to
conventions, trade shows, and other special events. However,
money may not be used for salaries or operating expenses
related to an event.
Sec. 5. All money deposited in the convention, visitor, and
tourism promotion fund shall be deposited, held, secured, invested,
and paid in accordance with statutes relating to the handling of
public funds. The handling and expenditure of money deposited in
the convention, visitor, and tourism promotion fund is subject to
audit and supervision by the state board of accounts.
Sec. 6. (a) A person who knowingly:
(1) approves the transfer of money to any person or
corporation not qualified under law for that transfer; or
(2) approves a transfer for a purpose not permitted under
law;
commits a Level 6 felony.
(b) A person who receives a transfer of money under this
chapter and knowingly uses that money for any purpose not
permitted under this chapter commits a Level 6 felony.
Sec. 7. A tax imposed by a municipality under this chapter
terminates on January 1 of the calendar year that begins
twenty-two (22) years after the effective date specified in the
ordinance.
2026 IN 1117—LS 6619/DI 125


SECTION 2. IC 6-9-29-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter applies to all
counties and municipalities imposing an innkeeper's tax under this
article.
SECTION 3. IC 6-9-29-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.137-2022,
SECTION 91, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) Unless otherwise provided in this article,
a county fiscal body or a municipal fiscal body that adopts an
ordinance to impose, rescind, or increase or decrease the rate of a
county innkeeper's tax or a municipal innkeeper's tax, or to make a
change between collection of the tax by the county treasurer or the
municipal fiscal officer, or the department of state revenue, must
specify the effective date of the ordinance to provide that the ordinance
takes effect:
(1) at least thirty (30) days after the adoption of the ordinance;
and
(2) on the first day of a month.
(b) If a county fiscal body or a municipal fiscal body adopts an
ordinance described in subsection (a), it must immediately send a
certified copy of the ordinance to the commissioner of the department
of state revenue. Notwithstanding subsection (a), if the department of
state revenue collects the revenue from the county innkeeper's tax or
the municipal innkeeper's tax, the department of state revenue shall
begin collecting the tax as provided in the ordinance for periods
beginning on or after the later of:
(1) the first day of the month that is not less than thirty (30) days
after the ordinance is sent to the commissioner of the department
of state revenue; or
(2) the effective date specified in the ordinance.
The department shall collect the tax at the rate in the ordinance unless
the rate is not authorized under this article.
(c) If an ordinance does not specify an effective date, the ordinance
shall be considered effective on the earliest date allowable under this
section.
SECTION 4. IC 6-9-29-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.175-2018,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) If an ordinance has been adopted requiring
the payment of the innkeeper's tax to the county treasurer or the
municipal fiscal officer instead of the department of state revenue, the
county treasurer or the municipal fiscal officer has the same rights
and powers with respect to collecting and refunding the county
innkeeper's tax or the municipal innkeeper's tax as the department of
2026 IN 1117—LS 6619/DI 125


state revenue.
(b) The department of state revenue shall prescribe a standard return
form to be used by a taxpayer with remittance of the innkeeper's tax:
(1) to the department of state revenue, if the taxpayer files a
separate return for the innkeeper's tax; or
(2) to the county treasurer, if an ordinance has been adopted
requiring the payment of the innkeeper's tax to the county
treasurer instead of the department of state revenue; or
(3) to the municipal fiscal officer, if an ordinance has been
adopted requiring the payment of the innkeeper's tax to the
municipal fiscal officer instead of the department of state
revenue.
SECTION 5. IC 6-9-29-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. Upon a request by a county
auditor or treasurer, or a municipal fiscal officer, the department of
state revenue shall provide summary data regarding innkeeper's tax
collections for the county or the municipality. This data may not
include any confidential information. The department shall provide the
summary data within ten (10) business days after the request is made.
SECTION 6. IC 35-52-6-76.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 76.5. IC 6-9-18.5-6 defines crimes
concerning innkeeper's taxes.
2026 IN 1117—LS 6619/DI 125